Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-4842
Law governing validity; choice of
law as to execution of document of gift; presumption of validity.

(a)
A document of gift is valid if executed in accordance with:

(1)
The Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act;

(2) The laws of the state or country where
it was executed; or

(3) The laws of the state or country where
the person making the anatomical gift was domiciled, has a place of residence,
or was a national at the time the document of gift was executed.

(b)
If a document of gift is valid under this section, the law of this state governs
the interpretation of the document of gift.

(c) A person may presume that a document
of gift or amendment of an anatomical gift is valid unless that person knows
that it was not validly executed or was revoked.

(d) The age restrictions of the
Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act do not nullify any designation of gift
made on a driver's license or state identification card prior to January 1,
2011, by a person younger than sixteen years of age which was valid when made.
Such person shall be considered a donor under the act, and if such a donor
who is an unemancipated minor dies, a parent of the donor who is reasonably
available may revoke or amend an anatomical gift of the donor's body or part.

Laws 2010, LB1036, § 19.